Utah statutes.
63M-8-301.   Duties.
The commission shall:
(1)  confer with state agencies and advise the governor, through the
governor's program director, concerning programs of importance to women and
families;
(2)  conduct studies, workshops, or fact-finding hearings to develop
recommendations for constructive action in all areas of interest to women and
families;
(3)  conduct or participate in educational programs concerning issues of
importance to women and families; and
(4)  act as a liaison between the governor and national advisory organizations
on the status of women or families.
